Connecticut, session 2026, HB05231.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That subparagraph (B)(xvi) of subdivision (20) of subsection (a) of
section 12-701 of the general statutes be amended to expand the personal
income tax deduction for any income received from the United States
government as retirement pay to include retired members of the
commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric
Administration and the commissioned corps of the Public Health
Service.